Wisconsin, session 2025, AB465.
do enact as follows:AB465,11Section 1. 102.60 (1m) (c) of the statutes is amended to read:AB465,2,52102.60 (1m) (c) An amount equal to double the amount recoverable by the 3injured employee, but not to exceed $15,000, if the injured employee is a minor of 4permit age or older and at the time of the injury is employed, required, suffered, or 5permitted to work at prohibited employment.AB465,26Section 2. 103.25 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:AB465,2,107103.25 (1) A minor under 16 years of age shall not be employed or permitted 8to work at any street trade unless the minor’s employer first obtains from the 9department or a permit officer a street trade permit and the minor first obtains an 10identification card, both issued in accordance with this section.AB465,311Section 3. 103.27 (2) of the statutes is amended to read:AB465,2,1612103.27 (2) Every employer shall receive and file a street trade permit 13authorizing employment of each minor under 16 years of age by the employer before 14the minor is permitted to work; and shall keep the permit on file and allow 15inspection of the permit at any time by the department or any police or school 16attendance officer.AB465,417Section 4. 103.28 (2) of the statutes is amended to read:AB465,2,2118103.28 (2) The failure of an employer to produce for inspection by the 19department or any school attendance or police officer a permit required for a minor 20under 16 years of age employed in street trades is prima facie evidence of unlawful 21employment of the minor.AB465,522Section 5. 103.70 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:AB465,3,101103.70 (1) Except as otherwise provided in sub. (2) and in ss. 103.21 to 103.31, 2103.78, 938.245 (2) (a) 5. b., 938.32 (1t) (a) 2., and 938.34 (5) (b) and (5g) (c), and as 3may be provided under s. 103.79, a minor under 16 years of age may not be 4employed or permitted to work at any gainful occupation or employment, unless 5employed under an apprentice contract under s. 106.01, unless 12 years and over 6and engaged in farming, unless 14 years and over and enrolled in a youth 7apprenticeship program under s. 106.13, or unless there is first obtained from the 8department or a permit officer a written permit authorizing the employment of the 9minor within those periods of time stated in the permit, which may not exceed the 10maximum hours prescribed by law.AB465,611Section 6. 103.70 (2) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:AB465,3,1612103.70 (2) (a) A minor under 16 years of age may be employed without a 13permit in or around a home in work usual to the home of the employer, if the work 14is not in connection with or a part of the business, trade, or profession of the 15employer; is in accordance with the minimum age stated in s. 103.67 (2) (f); and is 16not specifically prohibited by ss. 103.64 to 103.82 or by an order of the department.AB465,717Section 7. 103.70 (2) (b) (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:AB465,3,2218103.70 (2) (b) (intro.) A minor under 16 years of age may be employed without 19a permit by a nonprofit organization in and around the home of an elderly person or 20a person with a disability to perform snow shoveling, lawn mowing, leaf raking, or 21other similar work usual to the home of the elderly person or person with a 22disability, if all of the following apply:AB465,823Section 8. 103.70 (2) (c) of the statutes is created to read:AB465,4,21103.70 (2) (c) A minor may be employed without a permit as an election 2inspector as provided in s. 7.30 (2) (am).AB465,93Section 9. 103.71 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:AB465,4,84103.71 (1) Except as provided in s. 103.78, a permit shall not be issued 5authorizing any minor to be employed during the hours that the minor is required 6to attend school under s. 118.15. The department and its permit officers shall 7accept a high school diploma or a high school equivalency diploma as evidence that 8a minor has completed high school.AB465,109Section 10. 103.74 (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:AB465,4,1210103.74 Duties of employers of minors. (intro.) Every employer employing 11a minor under 16 years of age for whom a permit is required, except in street trades, 12shall:AB465,1113Section 11. 103.80 (2) of the statutes is amended to read:AB465,4,1814103.80 (2) The failure of any employer to produce for inspection by the 15department, or school attendance officers, a permit required for a minor under 16 16years of age under s. 103.70 shall be prima facie evidence of unlawful employment 17of the minor. The presence of any minor in any factory, workshop or other place of 18employment shall be prima facie evidence of the employment of the minor.AB465,1219Section 12. 103.81 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:AB465,5,220103.81 (1) Except as provided in sub. (2m), during During the term that the 21public schools are in session, a person shall not advertise or cause or permit any 22advertisement to be published in any newspaper for the labor or services of any 23minor during school hours in any employment for which a child labor permit is 1required under s. 103.70 that does not specifically state the minimum age of the 2minor whose services are desired.AB465,133Section 13. 103.81 (2) of the statutes is amended to read:AB465,5,64103.81 (2) Except as provided in sub. (2m), a A person shall not solicit in the 5schools or homes of this state, minors to leave school and enter their employment if 6a child labor permit is required for that employment by s. 103.70.AB465,147Section 14. 103.81 (2m) of the statutes is repealed.AB465,158Section 15. Initial applicability.AB465,5,109(1) The treatment of s. 102.60 (1m) (c) first applies to an injury or death 10occurring on the effective date of this subsection.AB465,1611Section 16. Effective date.AB465,5,1312(1) This act takes effect on the first day of the 7th month beginning after 13publication.AB465,5,1414